Hawaii statutes.
CHAPTER
425E

UNIFORM
LIMITED PARTNERSHIP ACT

ARTICLE 1.
GENERAL PROVISIONS

Section

425E-101 Short title

425E-102 Definitions

425E-103 Knowledge and notice

425E-104 Nature, purpose, and duration of entity

425E-105 Powers

425E-106 Governing law

425E-107 Supplemental principles of law; rate of
interest

425E-108 Name

425E-108.5 Administrative order of abatement for
infringement

of limited partnership name

425E-109 Reserved name

425E-110 Effect of partnership agreement;
nonwaivable

provisions

425E-111 Required information

425E-112 Business transactions between a partner
and the

partnership

425E-113 Dual capacity

425E-114 Registered agent

425E-115 Designation or change of registered
agent

425E-116 Resignation of registered agent

425E-117 Service on the partnership

425E-118 Consent and proxies of partners

ARTICLE 2.
FORMATION; CERTIFICATE OF LIMITED

PARTNERSHIP;
OTHER FILINGS; FEES

425E-201 Certificate of limited partnership

425E-202 Amendment or restatement of certificate

425E-203 Statement of termination

425E-204 Execution of records

425E-205 Signing and filing pursuant to judicial
order

425E-206 Filing in the office of the director;
effective time

and date

425E-206.5 Filing requirements; filing duty of the
director

425E-207 Correcting a filed document

425E-208 Liability for false information in a
filed record

425E-209 Certificates and certified copies to be
received in

evidence

425E-210 Annual statement

425E-211 Fees for filing documents and issuing
certificates

ARTICLE 3.
LIMITED PARTNERS

425E-301 Limited partner

425E-302 No right or power as limited partner to
bind limited

partnership

425E-303 Liability as a limited partner

425E-304 Right of limited partner and former
limited partner

to information

425E-305 Limited duties of limited partners

425E-306 Person erroneously believing self to be
a limited

partner

ARTICLE 4.
GENERAL PARTNERS

425E-401 General partner

425E-402 General partner is an agent of the
limited

partnership

425E-403 Limited partnership liable for general
partner's

actionable conduct

425E-404 General partner's liability

425E-405 Actions by and against partnership and
partners

425E-406 Management rights of general partners

425E-407 Right of general partner and former
general partner

to information

425E-408 General standards of a general partner's
conduct

ARTICLE 5.
CONTRIBUTIONS AND DISTRIBUTIONS

425E-501 Form of contribution

425E-502 Liability for contribution

425E-503 Sharing of distributions

425E-504 Interim distributions

425E-505 No distribution on account of dissociation

425E-506 Distribution in kind

425E-507 Right to distribution

425E-508 Limitations on distribution

425E-509 Liability for improper distributions

ARTICLE 6.
DISSOCIATION

425E-601 Dissociation as a limited partner

425E-602 Effect of dissociation as a limited
partner

425E-603 Dissociation as a general partner

425E-604 Person's power to dissociate as a
general partner;

wrongful dissociation

425E-605 Effect of dissociation as a general
partner

425E-606 Power to bind, and liability to, limited
partnership

before dissolution of partnership of a
person

dissociated as general partner

425E-607 Liability to other persons of person
dissociated as

a general partner

ARTICLE 7.
TRANSFERABLE INTERESTS AND

RIGHTS OF
TRANSFEREES AND CREDITORS

425E-701 Partner's transferable interest

425E-702 Transfer of partner's transferable
interest

425E-703 Rights of creditors of partners or
transferees

425E-704 Power of estate of deceased partner

ARTICLE 8.
DISSOLUTION

425E-801 Nonjudicial dissolution

425E-802 Judicial dissolution

425E-803 Winding up

425E-804 Power of general partner and person
dissociated as

general partner to bind partnership
after

dissolution

425E-805 Liability after dissolution of general
partner and

person dissociated as general partner to
limited

partnership, other general partners, and
persons

dissociated as general partners

425E-806 Known claims against dissolved limited
partnership

425E-807 Other claims against dissolved limited
partnership

425E-808 Liability of general partner and person
dissociated

as general partner when claim against
limited

partnership barred

425E-809 Administrative cancellation

425E-810 Reinstatement following administrative
cancellation

425E-811 Appeal from denial of reinstatement

425E-812 Disposition of assets; when
contributions required

ARTICLE 9.
FOREIGN LIMITED PARTNERSHIPS

425E-901 Governing law

425E-902 Application for certificate of authority

425E-903 Activities not constituting transacting
business

425E-904 Issuance of certificate of authority

425E-905 Name

425E-906 Cancellation of certificate of authority

425E-907 Certificate of withdrawal; effect of
failure to have

certificate

425E-908 Changes and amendments

ARTICLE 10.
ACTIONS BY PARTNERS

425E-1001 Direct action by a partner

425E-1002 Derivative action

425E-1003 Proper plaintiff

425E-1004 Pleading

425E-1005 Proceeds and expenses

ARTICLE 11.
CONVERSION AND MERGER

425E-1101 Definitions

425E-1102 Conversion into or from limited
partnerships

425E-1103 Articles of conversion

425E-1104 Effective date of the conversion

425E-1105 Effect of conversion

425E-1106 Merger

425E-1107 Articles of merger

425E-1108 Effective date of the merger

425E-1109 Effect of merger

425E-1110 Restrictions on approval of conversions
and mergers

and on relinquishing limited liability
limited

partnership status

425E-1111 Liability of general partners after
conversion or

merger

425E-1112 Power of general partners and persons
dissociated as

general partners to bind organization
after

conversion or merger

425E-1113 Article not exclusive

425E-1114 Foreign mergers

ARTICLE 12.
MISCELLANEOUS PROVISIONS

425E-1201 Uniformity of application and
construction

425E-1202 Severability clause

425E-1203 Relation to Electronic Signatures in
Global and

National Commerce Act

425E-1204 Application to existing relationships

425E-1205 Savings clause

425E-1206 Personal liability and penalty

Cross References

Limited liability partnerships, see §§425-151 to 173.

Uniform limited liability company act, see chapter 428.

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next